Connecticut, session 2026, SB00308.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Subsection (e) of section 10-220 of the 2026 supplement to
2 the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
3 thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
4 (e) Each local and regional board of education shall establish a school
5 district curriculum committee. The committee shall recommend,
6 develop, review and approve all curriculum for the local or regional
7 school district. Each local and regional board of education shall (1) make
8 available all curriculum approved by the committee and all associated
9 curriculum materials in accordance with the requirements of the
10 Protection of Pupil Rights Amendment, 20 USC 1232h, and (2) for the
11 school year commencing July 1, 2026, and each school year thereafter,
12 post [objectives and scope and sequence of] all approved curriculum,
13 including the objectives and scope and sequence of such approved
14 curriculum, on the Internet web site of such board.
SB308 / File No. 456 1

SB308 File No. 456
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 10-220(e)
ED Joint Favorable
SB308 / File No. 456 2

SB308 File No. 456
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill, which requires boards of education to post all curriculum
information online, has no fiscal impact. It is anticipated that they can
meet this requirement with existing resources.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
SB308 / File No. 456 3

SB308 File No. 456
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 308
AN ACT REQUIRING BOARDS OF EDUCATION TO POST
CURRICULUM ONLINE.